Oklahoma, session 2025, SB77.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1239 of Title 69, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “critical emergency route” means a


road that is regularly traveled by first responders and other


emergency services personnel in the course of their duties.


B. 1. All roads in this state that have been designated by the


Transportation Commission as part of the state highway system or by


the Federal Highway Administration as part of the National Highway


System shall be designated as critical emergency routes.

Req. No. 921 Page 1


2. Any political subdivision of this state may, by ordinance,


designate a road maintained by the county or municipality as a


critical emergency route if that road meets the definition of a


critical emergency route as provided in subsection A of this


section.


C. Any person who shall willfully or knowingly obstruct or


damage a road designated as a critical emergency route shall, upon


conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to


exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).


D. 1. Railroads or other persons, firms, or corporations


operating over tracks within this state shall not block vehicle


traffic at a railroad intersection with a road designated as a


critical emergency route for any amount of time.


2. If a train is stopped for an emergency condition including


an accident, derailment, critical mechanical failure, track or


bridge washout, storm, flood, or other emergency situation, and


blocks vehicle traffic at a railroad intersection with a road


designated as a critical emergency route, the railroad or other


person, firm, or corporation operating the train shall immediately


notify the Department of Public Safety of the emergency condition


and identify the intersection or intersections affected. The


Department of Public Safety shall then notify the county sheriff or


municipal police department in whose jurisdiction the affected


intersection is located.

Req. No. 921 Page 2


3. The Department of Public Safety shall have the authority to


issue a citation to any person, firm, or corporation that violates


the provisions of this subsection. Such person, firm, or


corporation shall be subject to a fine not to exceed One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-921 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:42:59 AM

























Req. No. 921 Page 3